Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-949
State college system; role and mission assignments; board of trustees; adopt policies.

The role and mission assignments enumerated in sections 85-950 to 85-958 shall apply to the state college system and its institutions. Such assignments shall prohibit, limit, or restrict only those programs or services provided for under such sections. The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall adopt and promulgate policies and procedures necessary to assure compliance with sections 85-194, 85-308, 85-606.01, 85-917 to 85-966, and 85-1511.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 33;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1082;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 27.